Utah statutes.
35A-1-501.   Legal representation of department.

At the request of the department, it is the duty of the county attorney or district attorney, as appropriate under Sections 17-18-1, 17-18-1.5, and 17-18-1.7, and the attorney general to represent the department in any legal action taken under this part, Chapter 3, Employment Support Act, or under Title 76, Chapter 8, Part 12, Public Assistance Fraud.



Amended by Chapter 132, 1999 General Session

